Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.225.151

Student-level truancy data—Reports—Data protocols and guidance for school districts.

(1) As required under subsection (2) of this section, the office of superintendent of public instruction shall collect and school districts shall submit student-level truancy data in order to allow a better understanding of actions taken under RCW 28A.225.030. The office shall prepare an annual report to the legislature by December 15th of each year.

(2) The reports under subsection (1) of this section shall include, disaggregated by student group:

(a) The number of enrolled students and the number of unexcused absences;

(b) The number of enrolled students with 15 or more unexcused absences in a school year or seven or more unexcused absences in a month during a school year;

(c) A description of any programs or schools developed to serve students who have had seven or more unexcused absences in a month or 15 in a year including information about the number of students in the program or school and the number of unexcused absences of students during and after participation in the program. The school district shall also describe any placements in an approved private nonsectarian school or program or certified program under a court order under RCW 28A.225.090;

(d) The number of petitions filed by a school district with the juvenile court and, beginning in the 2018-19 school year, whether the petition results in:

(i) Referral to a community engagement board;

(ii) Other coordinated means of intervention;

(iii) A hearing in the juvenile court; or

(iv) Other less restrictive disposition (e.g., change of placement, home school, alternative learning experience, residential treatment); and

(e) Each instance of imposition of detention for failure to comply with a court order under RCW 28A.225.090, with a statement of the reasons for each instance of detention.

(3) A report required under this section shall not disclose the name or other identification of a child or parent.

(4) The K-12 data governance group shall develop the data protocols and guidance for school districts in the collection of data to provide a clearer understanding of actions taken under RCW 28A.225.030.

[ 2021 c 119 s 8; (2021 c 119 s 6 expired August 1, 2021); 2017 c 291 s 7; 1996 c 134 s 5; 1995 c 312 s 72.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 119 ss 7-15: See note following RCW 28A.225.030.

Expiration date—2021 c 119 ss 5 and 6: See note following RCW 28A.225.030.

Effective date—2021 c 119 ss 1-6: See note following RCW 28A.225.007.

Findings—Intent—2021 c 119: See note following RCW 28A.225.007.

Short title—1995 c 312: See note following RCW 13.32A.010.